Utah statutes.
78B-15-706.   Effect of dissolution of marriage.

(1)  If a marriage is dissolved before placement of eggs, sperm, or an embryo, the former spouse is not a parent of the resulting child unless the former spouse consented in a record that if assisted reproduction were to occur after a divorce, the former spouse would be a parent of the child.

(2)  The consent of the former spouse to assisted reproduction may be revoked by that individual in a record at any time before placement of eggs, sperm, or embryos.

